Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-479
Rural emergency hospital; rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing minimum standards for the establishment and operation of rural emergency hospitals in accordance with the Health Care Facility Licensure Act, including licensure of rural emergency hospitals.

Laws 2022, LB697, § 7.